th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำที่อยู่: อะคริลิก; แก้ว; ตาข่าย; พลาสติก; ไม้; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Materijal staništa: Akril; Staklo; Mrežica; Plastika; Drvo; Ostalo
sk-SK: Materiál biotopu: Akryl; Sklo; Sieťovina; Plast; Drevo; Iné
es: Material del terrario: Acrílico; Vidrio; Malla; Plástico; Madera; Otros
hu: Élőhely anyaga: Akril; Üveg; Háló; Műanyag; Fa; Egyéb
da: Habitatmateriale: Akryl; Glas; Mesh; Plast; Træ; Andet
it: Materiale dell'habitat: Acrilico; Vetro; Mesh; Plastica; Legno; Altro
el: Υλικό ενδιαιτήματος: Ακρυλικό; Γυαλί; Πλέγμα; Πλαστικό; Ξύλο; Άλλο
cs: Materiál stanoviště: Akrylové; Sklo; Síťovina; Plast; Dřevo; Jiné
ro-RO: Material habitat: Acrilic; Sticlă; Plasă; Plastic; Lemn; Altele
fr: Matériau de l’habitat: Acrylique; Verre; A mailles; Plastique; Bois; Autre
en: Habitat material: Acrylic; Glass; Mesh; Plastic; Wood; Other
ko: 서식지 재료: 아크릴; 유리; 메쉬; 플라스틱; 목재; 기타
sv: Habitat - material: Akryl; Glas; Mesh; Plast; Trä; Övrigt
de: Habitat-Material: Acryl; Glas; Netz; Kunststoff; Holz; Sonstiges
zh-CN: 生态缸/生态盒材质: 丙烯酸; 玻璃; 网状; 塑料; 木头; 其他
pl: Materiał do siedlisk: Akryl; Szkło; Siatka; Tworzywo sztuczne; Drewno; Inne
pt-PT: Material de habitat: Acrílico; Vidro; Rede; Plástico; Madeira; Outro
nl: Materiaal habitat: Acryl; Glas; Gaas; Plastic; Hout; Andere
zh-TW: 棲息地物質: 壓克力; 玻璃; 網布; 塑膠; 木材; 其他
lt-LT: Gyvenamosios vietos medžiaga: Akrilas; Stiklas; Tinklelis; Plastikas; Mediena; Kita
ru: Материал жилища для животных: Акрил; Стеклянные; Сетка; Пластик; Дерево; Другое
nb: Habitatmateriale: Akryl; Glass; Mesh; Plast; Trevirke; Annet
fi: Elinympäristön materiaali: Akryyli; Lasi; Verkko; Muovi; Puu; Muu
vi: Vật liệu môi trường sống: Acrylic; Thủy tinh; Lưới; Nhựa; Gỗ; Khác
sl-SI: Material bivališča: Akril; Steklo; Mreža; Plastika; Les; Drugo
tr: Yaşam alanı malzemesi: Akrilik; Cam; Ağ; Plastik; Ahşap; Diğer
pt-BR: Material do habitat: Acrílico; Vidro; Malha; Plástico; Madeira; Outro
bg-BG: Материал за местообитанието: Акрил; Стъкло; Мрежа; Пластмаса; Дърво; Други
ja: 生息地の素材: アクリル; ガラス; メッシュ; プラスチック; 木材; その他